Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-721
Candidate at special election; nomination by convention or committee; certificates of nomination; time of filing.

Any candidate of any political party for an office to be filled at a special election shall be nominated by a convention or central committee of his or her political party. The nomination shall be in writing, shall contain the name of the office for which each person was nominated and the name and residence of each person so nominated, including, if in a city, the street and number of residence, and place of business, if any, and shall designate in not more than five words the political party which such convention or committee represents. The presiding officer and the secretary of such convention or committee shall sign the nomination and include their respective places of business and take an oath before an officer qualified to administer oaths that the affiants were such officers at such convention or committee and that the certificate and the statements therein contained are true to the best of their knowledge and belief. Such conventions or committee meetings shall be held not less than seventy days prior to the date fixed by law for the election of the persons so nominated. The nomination shall be filed with the filing officer prescribed in section 32-607 not less than seventy days before the election.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 221.

Form of certificate, set out in opinion, was approved. State ex rel. Norton v. Van Camp, 36 Neb. 91, 54 N.W. 113 (1893).